Hawaii statutes.
§428-207 Correcting filed record. (a)
A limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may correct a
record filed by the director if the record contains a false or erroneous
statement or was defectively certified or signed.

(b) A record is corrected:

(1) By preparing articles of correction that:

(A) Describe the record, including its filing
date, or have attached a copy of it to the articles of correction;

(B) Specify the incorrect statement and the
reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the certification or signing was
defective; and

(C) Correct the incorrect statement or
defective certification or signing; and

(2) By delivering the articles of correction to the
director for filing.

(c) Articles of correction are effective
retroactively to the effective date of the record they correct. However, a
person who has relied on the uncorrected record and was adversely affected by
the correction is not bound by the correction until the articles of correction
are filed. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §92; am L 2002, c 130,
§105]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next